Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 41.80.075 and 2023 c 204 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) RCW 41.56.065 applies to ((the following)) employers subject to this chapter((:(1) Western Washington University;(2) Central Washington University;(3) Eastern Washington University; and(4) The Evergreen State College)).(2) For the purposes of this section, until the one Washington enterprise resource management project human resources subproject (phase 2) is completed and fully implemented, an employer may not be held liable under this section or RCW 41.56.065 if the employer is unable to provide the information required under this section due to the limitations of the employer's current technological systems.--- END ---